District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

29A-101.48

Articles of incorporation — Procedure for filing.

Repealed.

History

June 8, 1954, 68 Stat. 199, ch. 269, § 48
Sept. 2, 1957, 71 Stat. 569, Pub. L. 85-254, § 8
Apr. 9, 1997, D.C. Law 11-255, § 28(j), 44 DCR 1271
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(j), 58 DCR 1720

Prior Codifications

2001 Ed., § 29-101.48.
1981 Ed., § 29-348.
1973 Ed., § 29-921b.